Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 2-6-502 of Title 27A, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Agritourism activity” means agritourism activity as defined


pursuant to Section 5-15 of Title 2 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


2. “Biosolid” means sludge, perfluoroalkyl, and any


polyfluoroalkyl substance;

Req. No. 3538 Page 1


3. “Department” means the Department of Environmental Quality;


4. “Product” shall include, but not be limited to, compost


material, fertilizer, soil amendment, topsoil replacement, and


mulch; and


5. “Sludge” means sludge as defined pursuant to Section 2-10-


401 of Title 27A of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. 1. Any person, business, or entity authorized to commence


industrial, municipal, and commercial operations in this state shall


disclose the use of biosolids when labeling products for sale and


distribution.


2. Any product under this subsection that is sold or


distributed in this state shall have clear and distinct labeling


disclosing that the product, either in its production or in its


composition, includes biosolids generated from an industrial,


municipal, or commercial wastewater treatment plant or sludge.


3. Full disclosure shall be given to any consumer who purchases


an agricultural crop or vegetative material for any agricultural


purpose if the crop or material was grown at a location in this


state where biosolids have been permitted to be applied or spread.


C. 1. Any person, business, or entity authorized to commence


industrial, municipal, and commercial operations in this state shall


disclose the use of biosolids by placing signage on any property


where such operations take place and where biosolids are utilized.


Such signage shall be in an area that is visible to the public.

Req. No. 3538 Page 2


2. Prior to the sale or lease of any property described under


this subsection, public access to the land shall be restricted for


one (1) year following the land application of biosolids as required


in 40 C.F.R., Part 503.


3. Any property under this subsection that is sold or leased


shall include a disclosure stating that the subject property was


used as a biosolids application site.


4. The Department shall publish and update annually a map of


biosolid land application property sites on a publicly available


website. All sites permitted to apply biosolids shall be labeled


with the date of each land application and the names of the


landowner and lessor, if applicable. Records shall be kept in


perpetuity.


D. The Department shall, in consultation with the Oklahoma


Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, provide written


notice to businesses conducting agritourism activities of any


biosolid land application taking place within a four-mile radius of


the business. Notice shall be transmitted at least sixty (60) days


prior to land application.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3538 BRC 1/14/2026 10:08:23 PM





Req. No. 3538 Page 3